Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 5. Filing Documents Evidencing Liens or Encumbrances.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 34, 37-41, 44-49.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 103-110.

Priorities as between previously perfected security interest and repairman’s lien on motor vehicle under Uniform Commercial Code, 69 ALR3d 1162.

Sufficiency of debtor’s signature under UCC §§ 9-203 and 9-402, 3 ALR4th 502.

Loss of garageman’s lien on repaired vehicle by owner’s use of vehicle, 74 ALR4th 90.

Sec. 28.10.371.
Filing documents evidencing liens or encumbrances.

A conditional sales contract, chattel mortgage, or other lien or encumbrance or title retention document on a registered vehicle, other than a lien dependent upon possession, is not valid against a vehicle owner’s creditor who acquires a lien dependent upon possession, or by levy or attachment, or against a subsequent purchaser or encumbrancer without notice, until the requirements of AS

28.10.371

—

28.10.401

are satisfied.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a lien on a manufactured home for the purchase of the manufactured home is valid against judicial lien creditors and execution creditors on and after the date the lien attaches under AS 45.29 against the manufactured home.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the holder of a lien on a manufactured home may deliver a lien release document to a person to facilitate conveying or encumbering the manufactured home. A person receiving the lien release document holds the document in trust for the lienholder.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (b) and (c).

Sec. 28.10.375.
Effect of terminal rental adjustment clauses.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a transaction involving a motor vehicle or trailer does not create a sale or security interest merely because the transaction provides that the rental price is permitted or required to be adjusted under the agreement either upward or downward by reference to the amount realized upon the sale or other disposition of the motor vehicle or trailer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1994)

Sec. 28.10.380.
Dealer’s transfer. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.381.
Filing a lien or encumbrance.

A lien or other encumbrance on a vehicle may be filed by delivering to the department

a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or an existing certificate of title;

an application for a new certificate of title, signed by the registered owner and containing the name and address of any lienholder and the date of the lienholder’s interest;

applicable filing fees required by law; and

other documents or information required by the department.

Upon approval of the application, the department shall send to the person holding a lien or other encumbrance a new certificate of title which displays the name of the owner and indicates the existence of the lien or other encumbrance.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

28.10.262

,

28.10.263

, and AS 34.85, after a certificate of title to a manufactured home has been issued and while the manufactured home is subject to a lien or encumbrance under (a) of this section,

the department may not cancel the manufacturer’s certificate of origin for the manufactured home under AS

28.10.262

, or cancel the certificate of title to the manufactured home under AS

28.10.263

; and

the validity and priority of the lien or encumbrance continues.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 20 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (c).

Sec. 28.10.390.
Transfer to dealer. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.391.
Filing and date of notice.

The filing of the application and documents under AS

28.10.381

and the issuance of a new certificate of title are constructive notice of any liens or encumbrances against the vehicle described in the certificate to a creditor of the owner, or to a subsequent purchaser or encumbrancer. However, a mortgage, conditional sale contract, or similar lien or encumbrance on the vehicle is subordinate to a lien under AS

28.10.502

and is subject to the procedure provided in that section. A lien or encumbrance on a vehicle for labor, material, transportation, storage, or similar activity, other than a lien under AS

28.10.502

, whether or not dependent on possession for its validity, is subordinate only to a mortgage, conditional sale contract, or similar lien or encumbrance on the vehicle properly filed on or before the time that the vehicle is subject to, or comes into possession of, the lien or encumbrance claimant for the labor, material, transportation, storage, or similar activity.

If the documents referred to in AS

28.10.371

—

28.10.401

are received and filed in the central office of the department within 10 days after the date that the documents were executed, the constructive notice dates from the time of the execution of the documents. Otherwise, constructive notice dates from the time of receipt and filing of the documents by the department as shown in its endorsement on the documents.

Filing as provided in AS

28.10.371

—

28.10.401

is the exclusive method of giving constructive notice of a lien or encumbrance on a registered vehicle, except as to a lien dependent upon possession.

A lien or encumbrance, or a document creating and evidencing a lien or encumbrance is exempt from the other provisions of law that require or relate to the recording or filing of a document creating and evidencing a lien or encumbrance upon a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this chapter.

Notwithstanding another provision of this section, the creation or termination of a lien or encumbrance with respect to a manufactured home that has been converted to real property under AS

34.85.010

is governed by the laws that apply to real property.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 2010; am § 19 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 29, 2010, in (a), added the second sentence, in the third sentence added “other than a lien under AS

28.10.502

,” following “storage, or similar activity,”, and “on the vehicle” following “similar lien or encumbrance”.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (e).

Sec. 28.10.400.
Transfer by dealer. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.401.
Assignment or release by lienholder.

A person holding a lien or encumbrance upon a vehicle, other than a lien dependent solely upon possession, may assign that person’s title to or interest in the vehicle to a person other than the owner without the consent of the owner and without affecting the interest of the owner or the registration of the vehicle. The person assigning the interest shall give written notice of the assignment to the owner. Upon receiving a certificate of title assigned by the holder of a lien or encumbrance shown on the certificate and the name and address of the assignee, accompanied by the title fee required under AS

28.10.441

, the department shall issue a new certificate of title.

A person holding a lien or encumbrance upon a vehicle, as shown on a certificate of title, may release the lien or encumbrance or assign that person’s interest to the owner of the vehicle without affecting the registration of the vehicle. Upon receiving a certificate of title upon which a lienholder has released or assigned the lienholder’s interest to the owner, or upon receipt of a certificate not endorsed but accompanied by a legal release from a lienholder of the lienholder’s interest to a vehicle, and upon payment of the title fee required under AS

28.10.441

, the department shall issue a new certificate of title.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Sec. 28.10.410.
Transfer by operation of law. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]